New York, session 2025-2026, S9481.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 343-ee 2 to read as follows: 3 § 343-ee. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Clara 4 H. Barton. All that portion of the state highway constituting state 5 route 63 in the village of Dansville, county of Livingston, from its 6 intersection with Zerfass Road to its intersection with Hubbard Lane 7 shall be dedicated to Clara H. Barton. 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 11 signage shall state "Highway Dedicated to Clara H Barton". However, to 12 avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the 13 dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one 14 of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 15 changed as a result of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14497-04-6